New York, session 2025-2026, A8722.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 85 of the civil service law is 2 amended by adding two new paragraphs (e) and (f) to read as follows: 3 (e) The term "military spouse" shall mean the spouse of a veteran or 4 non-disabled veteran. 5 (f) The term "surviving spouse" shall mean the spouse of a member of 6 any branch of the armed forces of the United States who served and 7 subsequently died due to a cause attributed to their military service. 8 § 2. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 of section 85 of the civil service 9 law, as added by chapter 790 of the laws of 1958, is amended to read as 10 follows: 11 (a) On all eligible lists resulting from competitive examinations, the 12 names of eligibles shall be entered in the order of their respective 13 final earned ratings on examination, with the name of the eligible with 14 the highest final earned rating at the head of such list, provided, 15 however, that for the purpose of determining final earned ratings, 16 (1) Disabled veterans shall be entitled to receive ten points addi- 17 tional in a competitive examination for original appointment and five 18 points additional credit in a competitive examination for promotion, 19 [and] 20 (2) Non-disabled veterans shall be entitled to receive five points 21 additional credit in a competitive examination for original appointment EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13165-04-6 A. 8722--A 2 1 and two and one-half points additional credit in a competitive examina- 2 tion for promotion[.], 3 (3) Military spouses shall be entitled to receive three points addi- 4 tional credit for a competitive examination for original appointment and 5 one and one-half points for a competitive examination for promotion, and 6 (4) Surviving spouses shall be entitled to receive six points addi- 7 tional credit for both a competitive examination for original appoint- 8 ment and a competitive examination for promotion. 9 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.